Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1151.2] School facilities
subaccount. (a) All proceeds from the leases, permits, interest income
generated from public school lands, and other revenue generated from the nonpermanent
disposition of public school lands, including facilities, pursuant to section
302A-1151.1 shall be deposited into the school facilities subaccount
established pursuant to section 302A‑1148(b).

(b) Except as otherwise provided, all moneys
in the school facilities subaccount shall be used exclusively for the new construction
and upgrade of twenty-first century school facilities, as well as the repair
and maintenance of existing school facilities. [L 2013, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next